District of Columbia statutes.
2-1210.10

Reports and audits.

(a)

The Mayor shall submit to the Council an annual status report on the program’s activities.

(b)

The financial transactions of the Fund shall be subject to audit by the District of Columbia Auditor as provided by § 1-204.55.

Mar. 12, 2011, D.C. Law 18-322, § 11, 57 DCR 12442
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 11 of Capital Access Program Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2011 (D.C. Act 19-6, February 11, 2011, 58 DCR 1408).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 11 of Capital Access Program Emergency Act of 2010 (D.C. Act 18-598, November 17, 2010, 57 DCR 11018).